Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1004.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1709-B(a) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 1709-B. Limitation on Credits.--(a) The total amount of credits approved by the department shall not exceed [sixty] one hundred twenty million dollars [($60,000,000)] ($120,000,000) in any fiscal year. Of that amount, [twelve] twenty-four million dollars [($12,000,000)] ($24,000,000) shall 123456789101112131415161718192021 be allocated exclusively for small businesses. However, if the total amounts allocated to either the group of applicants exclusive of small businesses or the group of small business applicants is not approved in any fiscal year, the unused portion will become available for use by the other group of qualifying taxpayers.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1004PN1091 - 2 - 12345678